Washington statutes.
RCW 26.60.020

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "State registered domestic partners" means two adults who meet the requirements for a valid state registered domestic partnership as established by RCW 26.60.030 and who have been issued a certificate of state registered domestic partnership by the secretary.

(2) "Secretary" means the secretary of state's office.

(3) "Share a common residence" means inhabit the same residence. Two persons shall be considered to share a common residence even if:

(a) Only one of the domestic partners has legal ownership of the common residence;

(b) One or both domestic partners have additional residences not shared with the other domestic partner; or

(c) One domestic partner leaves the common residence with the intent to return.

[ 2007 c 156 s 2.]